Wisconsin, session 2025, AB872.
do enact as follows:AB872,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB872,26Section 2. 20.155 (3) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB872,2,8720.155 (3) (e) Energy innovation grant program. The amounts in the schedule 8for the energy innovation grant program under s. 196.379.AB872,39Section 3. 196.379 of the statutes is created to read:AB872,2,1210196.379 Energy innovation grant program. The office of energy 11innovation in the commission shall administer the energy innovation grant 12program.AB872,413Section 4. Effective date.AB872,2,1514(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 15publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB872,2,1616